Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201148-801.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-801 to 48-839 shall be known and
may be cited as the Industrial Relations Act.

Laws 1986, LB 809, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 365, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 382, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 2.